Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1667.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.70 RCW to read as follows:(1) Subject to amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall contract with a training entity to deliver age-appropriate comprehensive cancer education programs to students in grades six through 12. Each school district may voluntarily decide whether to offer the programs and which grades to include.(2) The comprehensive cancer education programs shall be designed to be delivered in single sessions compatible with the normal length of a daily class period, typically 50 to 75 minutes long. Depending on the needs of each school district, to the extent practicable, the content must align with existing school health curricula and be adaptable to various formats, including assemblies for all students or specific grades, individual class sessions, or extended over multiple sessions. The program will provide age-appropriate information on cancer, covering topics such as cancer prevention, risk reduction, and available social and emotional resources. Additionally, the program must be designed to encourage supplemental teacher education to extend content beyond the initial programming, and across multisubject disciplines.(3) In selecting a training entity to contract with, the department shall select an entity with a demonstrated record of delivering comprehensive cancer education programs to youth in Washington, in both school settings and youth organizations, that address the topics of cancer prevention, cancer risk reduction, and available social and emotional resources. The training entity must be able to provide evidence of past performance, such as documented outcomes, testimonials, or case studies that show the effectiveness and impact of its programs.(4) The department shall require the training entity to use the funds provided in this section to enhance and expand its comprehensive cancer education program in Washington. These funds are intended to supplement, not replace, current offerings, assuring the state is purchasing additional capacity to deliver:(a) Additional programs beyond the number that the training entity provided in the 2023-24 academic calendar year;(b) Programs across geographically diverse parts of the state;(c) Programs in a manner that assures racial and ethnic diversity among the total number of students receiving the program; and(d) Programs to Spanish-speaking students. Additional language options may be considered in the future.(5) The selected training entity may contract with other persons or training entities, as necessary, to meet the demand for delivering the comprehensive cancer education program and to deliver the program in Spanish. These contracted entities must be held to the same standards as the selected training entity, presenting content, conducting evaluations, and collecting feedback from students and schools.(6)(a) By December 1, 2027, the department must report to the governor and the legislature on the comprehensive cancer education programs offered under this section. The report must include:(i) The total number of programs delivered by school district, including the geographic location of the schools where the programs were delivered;(ii) Student participation information, including number, geographic location, age, and grade level;(iii) The number of programs offered in Spanish and the number of participating students; and(iv) Other relevant information and recommendations pertaining to the program.(b) The selected training program must report information to the department as the department finds necessary to complete its reporting requirements.--- END ---